Ohio, session 136, SB132.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 1509.023 of the Revised Code be 7
enacted to read as follows: 8
Sec. 1509.023. Notwithstanding any section of the Revised 9
Code to the contrary, the director of natural resources or any 10
other state authority shall not issue any permit, make any 11
lease, or otherwise grant authorization to take or remove oil or 12
natural gas from and under any land owned or controlled by the 13
state via horizontal well. 14
Section 2. This act shall be known as the Protecting 15
public Resources, Ecosystems, and Sensitive lands from 16
Extraction, Violation, and Exploitation (PRESERVE) Act. 17